Missouri, session 2026, SB1756.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 7.005. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Regional Engagement Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service...............................................$1,710,496
Expense and Equipment...................................... 755,487
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,465,983

Personal Service................................................. 355,018
Expense and Equipment...................................... 60,136
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)............................ 415,154
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development -Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123)............................. 63,521

SB 1756 2

Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547).......................................................... 22,170

Expense and Equipment
From International Promotions Revolving Fund (1567). ....................... 600,001

Expense and Equipment
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)...................... 355,000

For regional engagement and minority participation and inclusion
efforts
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 91,666

For International Trade and Investment Offices
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783).....................1,500,000

For business recruitment and marketing
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)................. 3,500,000
Total..............................................................$9,013,495

Section 7.010. To the Department of Economic Development
For Delta Regional Authority Organizational Dues
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)..................... $168,945

Section 7.015. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service...............................................$2,356,175
Expense and Equipment...................................... 166,265
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,522,440

Personal Service................................................1,473,705
Expense and Equipment...................................... 253,377
From Department of Economic Development -Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123)...........................1,727,082
Personal Service................................................. 112,708
Expense and Equipment...................................... 20,000

SB 1756 3
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547)......................................................... 132,708

Personal Service.................................................. 56,576
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,890
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766).................. 60,466

Personal Service
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)...................... 214,642

For an organization of sworn law enforcement officers for improving
the working conditions of law enforcement officers and the
safety of those they serve through education, legislation,
information, community involvement and employee
representation
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 500,000

For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
that is credited to the Economic Development Advancement
Fund
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)................. 10,000
Total..............................................................$5,167,338

Section 7.020. To the Department of Economic Development
For tourism infrastructure pursuant to Section 99.585, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,500,000

Section 7.025. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$36,856,615

Section 7.030. To the Department of Economic Development
For Missouri supplemental tax increment financing as provided in
Section 99.845, RSMo. This appropriation may be used for the
following projects: Springfield Jordan Valley Park, Kansas City
Bannister Mall/Three Trails Office, Old Post Office in Kansas
City (Pershing Road), 1200 Main Garage Project in Kansas
City, Riverside Levee, Branson Landing, Eastern Jackson

SB 1756 4
County Bass Pro, Kansas City East Village Project, St. Louis
Innovation District, National Geospatial Agency West, Fenton
Logistics Park, IDEA Commons, and Lakeport Village. The
presence of a project in this list is not an indication said project
is nor shall be approved for tax increment financing. A listed
project must have completed the application process and a
certificate of approval must have been issued pursuant to
Section 99.845 (10), RSMo, before a project may be disbursed
funds subject to the appropriation.
From Missouri Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund (1848)...........$36,856,615

Section 7.035. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by development projects, as required by
Section 99.963, RSMo, to the State Supplemental Downtown
Development Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,902,617

Section 7.040. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Downtown Economic Stimulus Act as provided in
Sections 99.915 to 99.980, RSMo
From State Supplemental Downtown Development Fund (1766)...............$3,848,056

Section 7.045. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts generated by redevelopment projects, as required by
Section 99.1092, RSMo, to the Downtown Revitalization
Preservation Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $360,500

Section 7.050. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Downtown Revitalization Preservation Program as provided in
Sections 99.1080 to 99.1092, RSMo
From Downtown Revitalization Preservation Fund (1907)..................... $360,500

Section 7.055. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Community Development Block Grant Program

SB 1756 5
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development – Community Development
Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118)..........................$57,318,920

For the Community Development Block Grant - Disaster Recovery
Program
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Economic Development – Community Development
Block Grant (Pass-Through) Fund (1118)...........................47,681,080

For the Community Development Block Grant - Federal Stimulus
Program
For projects to support local community development activities
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus Fund
(2360).................................................... 18,399,870
Total............................................................$123,399,870

Section 7.060. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury from the
Economic Development Advancement Fund to the Missouri
Main Street Program Fund
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)..................... $700,000

Section 7.065. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For administration of the Missouri Main Street Program
From Missouri Main Street Program Fund (1596). .......................... $700,000

Section 7.070. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solutions Division
For the Missouri Community Service Commission
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $14,407

Personal Service................................................. 383,825
Expense and Equipment...................................... 16,590,451
From Community Service Commission Fund (1197). .................... 16,974,276
Total.............................................................$16,988,683

Section 7.085. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Business and Community Solution Division

SB 1756 6
For a grant to a public university with an established partnership with a
not-for-profit organization that has received a similar state-
funded grant for establishing Missouri in re-shoring active
pharmaceutical ingredient (API) manufacturing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,415,855

Section 7.090. To the Department of Economic Development
For the State Small Business Credit Initiative
From Department of Economic Development Federal Stimulus 2021
Fund (2451). ................................................$67,986,480

Section 7.095. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri One Start Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service................................................ $841,499
Expense and Equipment...................................... 106,414
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $947,913

Section 7.100. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Community College Training Program
For training of workers by community college districts
From Missouri One Start Community College Training Fund (1538). .........$27,000,000

Section 7.105. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri One Start Job Development Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$17,742,835

Section 7.110. To the Department of Economic Development
For new and expanding industry training programs and basic industry
retraining programs
From Missouri One Start Job Development Fund (1600)....................$17,742,835

Section 7.115. To the Department of Economic Development
For job training programs that provide upskill credentials
From Upskill Credential Training Fund (1849).............................$6,000,000

Section 7.120. To the Department of Economic Development

SB 1756 7
For the Strategy and Performance Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service...............................................$1,040,625
Expense and Equipment...................................... 187,802
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,228,427

Personal Service.................................................. 81,337
Expense and Equipment...................................... 12,832
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)............................. 94,169

For the purpose of promoting Missouri hardwood forest products and to
educate the public on the value and benefit of such products.
The Department may contract with any statewide associated
dedicated to the promotion of Missouri hardwood forest
products
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 600,000

Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547).................................................... 124,710
Total..............................................................$2,047,306

Section 7.125. To the Department of Economic Development
For Broadband Grants
Personal Service
From Department of Economic Development Federal and Other Fund
(1129).......................................................$2,167,302

Any provider deemed incapable of fulfilling the provider’s
obligations to deploy broadband internet pursuant to Section
1.513 RSMo, shall be forever barred from the receipt of any
new state or federal monies for broadband projects if the default
totals more than 20% of obligated broadband serviceable
locations
From Department of Economic Development Federal and Other Fund
(1129).................................................... 1,762,424,481
Total.......................................................... $1,764,591,783

Section 7.130. To the Department of Economic Development

SB 1756 8
For the response to, and analysis of, the impact of Missouri’s military
bases on the nation’s military readiness and the state’s economy
and advocacy of the continued presence and expansion of
military installations in the state, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service................................................ $208,564
Expense and Equipment...................................... 437,966
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $646,530

Section 7.135. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Military Community Reinvestment Program, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $300,000

Section 7.140. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.175
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$26,237,355

Section 7.145. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Division of Tourism to include coordination of advertising of at
least $70,000 for the Missouri State Fair, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service...............................................$2,140,035
Expense and Equipment...................................... 21,542,623
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ..............23,682,658

For the Missouri Film Office
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ................ 200,246

For a redevelopment authority to support the history and art form of
American Jazz located within a home rule city with more than

SB 1756 9
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ................ 100,000

For a museum, located within a home rule city with more than 400,000
inhabitants and located in more than one county, with archives
which highlight African-American cultural contributions and
history in Missouri
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ................ 300,000

For sponsorship of events that promote Missouri tourism
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ...............2,000,000

Expense and Equipment
From Tourism Marketing Fund (1650). ............................... 24,500
Total.............................................................$26,307,404

Section 7.150. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Major Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 7.155. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Meet in Missouri Act as provided in Section 620.1620, RSMo
From Major Economic Convention Event in Missouri Fund (1593).............$1,000,000

Section 7.160. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Housing Development Commission
For general administration of affordable housing activities
For funding housing subsidy grants or loans
From Missouri Housing Trust Fund (1254)................................$6,500,000

Section 7.165. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Administrative Services Division, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.175
Personal Service...............................................$1,124,319
Expense and Equipment...................................... 104,717
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,229,036


SB 1756 10
Personal Service.................................................. 63,161
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,777
From Department of Economic Development -Community Development
Block Grant (Administration) Fund (1123)............................. 64,938

Personal Service................................................. 361,209
Expense and Equipment...................................... 194,585
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547)......................................................... 555,794

For refunds
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547).................................................... 12,000
Total..............................................................$1,861,768

Section 7.170. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
payment of administrative costs, to the Department of
Economic Development Administrative Fund
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ............... $162,974
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783)................. 117,695
Total............................................................... $280,669

Section 7.175. To the Department of Economic Development
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1

Section 7.400. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Administrative Services
Personal Service................................................ $256,444
Expense and Equipment...................................... 47,404
From DCI Administrative Fund (1503).................................... $303,848

Section 7.405. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative services, to the DCI Administrative Fund,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.560

SB 1756 11
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $10,000
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548)................................. 30,000
From Division of Finance Fund (1550)..................................... 100,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). .................................... 37,000
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). ................................... 8,000
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607)............................... 140,000
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ........................... 180,000
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508)............................ 10,000
Total............................................................... $515,000

Section 7.410. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Insurance Operations, including market conduct and financial
examinations of insurance companies, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment and further provided twenty percent
(20%) flexibility is allowed between funds within this section
Personal Service..............................................$12,653,854
Expense and Equipment..........................................1,665,435
For refunds . .............................................. 75,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). .................................14,394,289

Personal Service................................................4,069,244
Expense and Equipment........................................... 401,033
For refunds................................................ 60,000
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552)...................................4,530,277
For consumer restitution payments
From Consumer Restitution Fund (1792). ............................. 5,000
Total.............................................................$18,929,566


Section 7.415. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For programs providing counseling on health insurance coverage and
benefits to Medicare beneficiaries
From Federal – Missouri Department of Insurance Fund (1192). ..............$1,650,000
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). .............................. 200,000
Total..............................................................$1,850,000

Section 7.420. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Credit Unions
Personal Service...............................................$1,576,381

SB 1756 12
Expense and Equipment...................................... 164,605
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548)..............................$1,740,986

Section 7.425. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Division of Finance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service..............................................$11,697,885
Expense and Equipment...................................... 878,769
From Division of Finance Fund (1550)...................................12,576,654

For Conference of State Bank Supervisors dues
From Division of Finance Fund (1550)................................ 175,000
Total.............................................................$12,751,654

Section 7.430. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of supervising state chartered savings and loan
associations, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549).................. $125,000

Section 7.435. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
purpose of administering the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Law, to the Division of Finance Fund
From Residential Mortgage Licensing Fund (1261). ........................$2,000,000

Section 7.440. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, in
accordance with Section 369.324, RSMo, to the General
Revenue Fund
From Division of Savings and Loan Supervision Fund (1549)................... $50,000

Section 7.445. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
implementation of the Missouri Family Trust Company Act
From Family Trust Company Fund (1810). ................................. $20,000

Section 7.450. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For general administration of the Division of Professional Registration,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment

SB 1756 13
Personal Service...............................................$5,100,038
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,086,395
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ..........................6,186,433

For examination and other fees
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ........................... 102,000

For Real Estate Appraiser Committee Fees
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ........................... 500,000

For refunds
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ...................... 125,000
Total..............................................................$6,913,433

Section 7.455. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Accountancy
Personal Service................................................ $410,551
Expense and Equipment...................................... 250,671
From State Board of Accountancy Fund (1627). ............................ $661,222

Section 7.460. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects
Personal Service................................................ $512,739
Expense and Equipment...................................... 306,502
From State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional
Land Surveyors and Professional Landscape Architects Fund
(1678)........................................................ $819,241

Section 7.465. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Chiropractic Examiners Fund (1630)..................... $132,503

Section 7.470. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners Fund (1785). .............. $317,062

Section 7.475. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Dental Board

SB 1756 14
Personal Service................................................ $487,975
Expense and Equipment...................................... 239,687
From Dental Board Fund (1677). ........................................ $727,662

Section 7.480. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Expense and Equipment
From Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors Fund (1633). ................ $165,501

Section 7.485. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Personal Service...............................................$2,601,938
Expense and Equipment...................................... 755,102
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634).................$3,357,040


Section 7.490. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Nursing
Personal Service...............................................$1,748,109
Expense and Equipment...................................... 580,063
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635). ................................2,328,172

For competitive grants to eligible institutions of higher education based
on a process and criteria jointly determined by the State Board
of Nursing and the Department of Higher Education and
Workforce Development
From State Board of Nursing Fund (1635). ............................ 3,000,000
Total..............................................................$5,328,172
Section 7.495. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Optometry
Expense and Equipment
From Optometry Fund (1636). ........................................... $35,419

Section 7.500. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Pharmacy
Personal Service...............................................$1,607,381
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,170,977
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637). ...................................2,778,358


SB 1756 15
For a non-profit association located in any city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand
but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants that was established
in 1879 and focused on pharmacy to develop a software system
to evaluate gaps in access to medications or other interventions
among patients with chronic diseases or high-risk factors
From Board of Pharmacy Fund (1637). ............................... 250,000
Total..............................................................$3,028,358

Section 7.505. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the State Board of Podiatric Medicine
Expense and Equipment
From State Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund (1629). ........................ $13,773

Section 7.510. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Real Estate Commission
Personal Service...............................................$1,298,700
Expense and Equipment...................................... 278,860
From Real Estate Commission Fund (1638). ..............................$1,577,560

Section 7.515. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Expense and Equipment
From Veterinary Medical Board Fund (1639)................................ $59,769

Section 7.520. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
administrative costs, to the General Revenue Fund
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various). .....................$1,461,218

Section 7.525. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
payment of operating expenses, to the Professional Registration
Fees Fund
From Professional Registration Board Funds (Various). ....................$10,828,052

Section 7.530. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
funding new licensing activity pursuant to Section 324.016,
RSMo, to the Professional Registration Fees Fund

SB 1756 16
From Board of Registration for the Healing Arts Fund (1634).................. $200,000

Section 7.535. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
reimbursement of funds loaned for new licensing activity
pursuant to Section 324.016, RSMo, to the appropriate board
fund
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). .......................... $320,000

Section 7.540. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For Manufactured Housing
Personal Service................................................ $516,757
Expense and Equipment...................................... 354,484
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). ................................. 871,241

For Manufactured Housing programs
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). .................................. 50,000

For refunds
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). .................................. 10,000

For Manufactured Housing to pay consumer claims
From Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund (1909)............. 192,000
Total
$1,123,241

Section 7.545. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Manufactured Housing Consumer Recovery Fund
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). ................................ $192,000

Section 7.550. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Office of the Public Counsel provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between subsections in this
section, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.560
Personal Service................................................ $175,887
Expense and Equipment...................................... 74,113
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 250,000

SB 1756 17

Personal Service................................................1,947,729
Expense and Equipment...................................... 829,686
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508)............................ 2,777,415
Total
$3,027,415

Section 7.555. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
For the Public Service Commission
For general administration of utility regulation activities, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment
Personal Service..............................................$21,799,851
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,393,197
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607).............................24,193,048

For refunds
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607)................................ 10,000

For the Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program Fund
(1559).................................................... 495,886
Total
$24,698,934

Section 7.560. To the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1

Section 7.800. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Director and Staff
Personal Service...............................................$3,853,361
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,397,513
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122). ..................................................5,250,874

Expense and Equipment
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)........... 1,010,000

SB 1756 18
Total
$6,260,874

Section 7.805. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
payment of administrative costs, to the Department of Labor
and Industrial Relations Administrative Fund, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $647,262
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186)......................... 58,784
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)...............3,586,698
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375). ................................................... 572,410
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
2021 Fund (2452)................................................ 250,388
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652).................................1,724,622
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949)........................ 174,067
Total
$7,014,231

Section 7.810. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for
payment of administrative costs charged by the Office of
Administration, to the Department of Labor and Industrial
Relations Administrative Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $609,028
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186)......................... 63,954
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)...............4,942,583
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375). ..................................................1,386,822
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
2021 Fund (2452)................................................ 397,842
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652).................................1,048,277
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949)........................ 128,804
Total
$8,577,310

Section 7.815. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations

SB 1756 19
For the Labor and Industrial Relations Commission, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................. $18,320
Expense and Equipment...................................... 868
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 19,188

Personal Service................................................. 680,373
Expense and Equipment...................................... 28,140
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)................ 708,513

Personal Service................................................. 624,807
Expense and Equipment...................................... 30,440
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652)............................. 655,247
Total
$1,382,948

Section 7.820. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For Administration, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................ $171,740
Expense and Equipment...................................... 17,086
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 188,826

Personal Service................................................. 113,255
Expense and Equipment...................................... 48,000
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186)........................ 161,255

Personal Service................................................. 135,229
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,330
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652).................................. 145,559

For the Child Labor Program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between the
Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage Program, and Minimum

SB 1756 20
Wage Program, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 72,735

Expense and Equipment
From Child Labor Enforcement Fund (1826). ................................ 79,903

For the Prevailing Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between the Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage
Program, and Minimum Wage Program, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................. 135,274
Expense and Equipment...................................... 512
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 135,786

For the Minimum Wage Program, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between the Child Labor Program, Prevailing Wage
Program, and Minimum Wage Program, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................. 144,369
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,480
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 149,849
Total
$933,913

Section 7.825. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
For safety and health programs
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $72,972


SB 1756 21
Personal Service................................................. 875,803
Expense and Equipment...................................... 261,055
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186).......................1,136,858

Personal Service................................................. 153,320
Expense and Equipment...................................... 39,542
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652)............................. 192,862
Total
$1,402,692

Section 7.830. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Labor Standards
For mine safety and health training programs
Personal Service................................................ $242,021
Expense and Equipment...................................... 137,429
From Division of Labor Standards Federal Fund (1186)........................ 379,450

Personal Service................................................. 104,501
Expense and Equipment...................................... 12,164
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652).................................. 116,665

For the Mine and Cave Inspection Program provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................. 140,322
Expense and Equipment...................................... 15,083
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 155,405

Personal Service.................................................. 80,407
Expense and Equipment...................................... 63,027
From State Mine Inspection Fund (1973). ............................. 143,434
Total
$794,954

Section 7.835. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the State Board of Mediation provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................. $72,516

SB 1756 22
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,314
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 78,830
Total
$78,830

Section 7.840. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For Administration provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service..............................................$10,079,168
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,382,595
From Workers Compensation Fund (1652)................................11,461,763

Personal Service.................................................. 65,511
Expense and Equipment...................................... 29,836
From Tort Victims Compensation Fund (1622). ........................ 95,347
Total.............................................................$11,557,110


Section 7.845. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payment of special claims
From Workers Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653). ..................$70,060,833

Section 7.850. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For refunds for overpayment of any tax or any payment credited to the
Workers’ Compensation - Second Injury Fund
From Workers Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653). .................... $250,000

Section 7.855. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Line
of Duty Compensation Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,200,000

Section 7.860. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Line of Duty Compensation Program as provided in Section
287.243, RSMo
From Line of Duty Compensation Fund (1939). ...........................$1,200,000


SB 1756 23
Section 7.865. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Workers’ Compensation
For payments of claims to tort victims
From Tort Victims Compensation Fund (1622). .........................$150,000,000

Section 7.870. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, pursuant
to Section 537.675, RSMo, to the Basic Civil Legal Services
Fund
From Tort Victims Compensation Fund (1622). ...........................$1,300,000

Section 7.875. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $819,142

Personal Service...............................................25,328,476
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,809,646
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)..............33,138,122

Personal Service................................................3,292,274
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,600,846
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
Fund (2375). ..................................................4,893,120

Personal Service................................................. 400,314
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,449,216
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Federal Stimulus
2021 Fund (2452)...............................................1,849,530

Personal Service................................................6,679,992
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,320,008
From Unemployment Administration Adjustment Fund (1387)................10,000,000

Personal Service................................................. 532,558
Expense and Equipment...................................... 16,143
From Unemployment Automation Fund (1953). ............................. 548,701
For information technology hardware, software, and/or system
enhancements and improvements

SB 1756 24
Personal Service................................................. 893,657
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,000,000

From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)........... 4,893,657
Total.............................................................$56,142,272

Section 7.880. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For administration of programs authorized and funded by the United
States Department of Labor, such as Disaster Unemployment
Assistance (DUA), and provided that all funds shall be
expended from discrete accounts and that no monies shall be
expended for funding administration of these programs by the
Division of Employment Security
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)..............$2,000,000

Section 7.885. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service...............................................$3,434,082
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,498,000
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949)...........................$9,932,082

Section 7.890. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Program
Expense and Equipment
From War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Fund (1736). ................ $5,000

For payment of benefits
From War on Terror Unemployment Compensation Fund (1736). .......... 35,000
Total................................................................ $40,000

Section 7.895. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For the Division of Employment Security
For the payment of refunds set off against debts as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)..................................$10,000,000

Section 7.900. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations

SB 1756 25
For the Missouri Commission on Human Rights, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 7.905
Personal Service................................................ $725,796
Expense and Equipment...................................... 15,178
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 740,974

Personal Service................................................. 852,085
Expense and Equipment...................................... 104,026
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Commission on
Human Rights Federal Fund (1117).................................. 956,111

For the Martin Luther King, Jr. State Celebration Commission,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 7.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 55,300
From Martin Luther King Jr State Celebration Commission Fund (1438). .... 5,000
Total..............................................................$1,757,385

Section 7.905. To the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
(cid:252)